California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) Notwithstanding any other law, if a fine is paid to satisfy an assessment based on the finding of a violation, payment of the fine shall be represented as satisfactory resolution of the matter for purposes of public disclosure.

(i) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Optometry Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys collected as fines and deposited in the fund be used by the board primarily for enforcement purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 54.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2556.5.

Any person who holds himself out as a “dispensing optician” or “registered dispensing optician” or who uses any other term or letters indicating or implying that he is registered and holds a certificate under the terms of this law without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked certificate, as provided in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

2557.

This chapter shall not affect any person licensed as an optometrist under Chapter 7 of Division II of this code, or any physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 of Division II of this code. Such exemption shall not apply to any optometrist or physician and surgeon exclusively engaged in the business of filling prescriptions for physicians and surgeons. This chapter does not prohibit the sale of goggles, sun glasses, colored glasses, or occupational protective eye devices if they do not have refractive values nor do the provisions of this chapter prohibit the sale of complete ready-to-wear eyeglasses as merchandise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

2557.1.

A certificate issued to a registered spectacle or contact lens dispenser may in the discretion of the board be suspended or revoked for violating or attempting to violate any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted under this chapter, or for incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated similar negligent acts performed by the certificate holder. A certificate may also be suspended or revoked if the individual certificate holder has been convicted of a felony as provided in Section 2555.1.

Any proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the
 powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 55.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2558.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, any regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 489, Sec. 20.   (SB 1478)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2558.1.

A registered dispensing optician shall not dispense a spectacle lens or contact lens prescription unless the prescription meets the requirements of Section 2541.1 or 2541.2, as applicable. A registered dispensing optician shall not dispense a spectacle lens prescription after the expiration date of the prescription unless so authorized pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2541.1. A person violating this section shall not be guilty of a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 2558. A violation of this section shall be considered unprofessional conduct by the board. A registered dispensing optician may defend this proceeding by establishing that the expiration date of the prescription was not established consistent with Section 2541.1. Nothing in this section shall be
 construed to authorize a registered dispensing optician to fill a prescription after the expiration date or to make any judgment regarding the appropriateness of the expiration date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2558.2.

Any individual, corporation, or firm operating as a registered dispensing optician under this chapter who demonstrates a willful disregard for the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 57.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2559.

Whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices which constitute, or will constitute, a violation of any provision of this chapter, or Chapter 5.4 (commencing with Section 2540), the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining such conduct on application of the board, the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the county.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 489, Sec. 21.   (SB 1478)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Spectacle Lens Dispensing [2559.1. - 2559.4.]

2559.1.

(a) An individual shall not fit and adjust spectacle lenses unless either of the following applies:

(1) The individual is a duly registered spectacle lens dispenser as provided in Section 2559.2.

(2) The individual is an unregistered individual who performs the fitting and adjusting under the direct responsibility and supervision of a duly registered spectacle lens dispenser whose certificate of registration is then conspicuously and prominently displayed on the premises.

(b) A supervising registered spectacle lens dispenser shall be physically present on the
 registered premises when an unregistered individual fits and adjusts spectacle lenses.

(c) The board shall not take action for a violation of subdivision (b) if either of the following apply:

(1) A supervising registered spectacle lens dispenser was not physically present on the registered premises due to reasonably unanticipated circumstances, including, but not limited to, illness, injury, family emergency, or the supervising registered spectacle lens dispenser’s termination or resignation, and reasonable action was taken to have another supervising registered spectacle lens dispenser be physically present on the registered premises.

(2) A supervising registered spectacle lens dispenser was not physically present
 due to a legally required employee meal or break period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 7.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2559.2.

(a) An individual shall apply for registration as a registered spectacle lens dispenser on forms prescribed by the board. The board shall register an individual as a registered spectacle lens dispenser upon satisfactory proof that the individual has passed the registry examination of the American Board of Opticianry or any successor agency to that board. In the event the board should determine, after hearing, that the registry examination is not appropriate to determine entry level competence as a spectacle lens dispenser or is not designed to measure specific job performance requirements, the board may thereafter prescribe or administer a written examination that meets those specifications. If an applicant for renewal has not engaged in the full-time
 or substantial part-time practice of fitting and adjusting spectacle
 lenses but has maintained their American Board of Opticianry and National Contact Lens Examiners registration or practiced within another state within the last three years then the board may require the applicant to take and pass the examination referred to in this section as a condition of registration. Any examination prescribed or administered by the board shall be given at least twice each year on dates publicly announced at least 90 days before the examination dates. The board is authorized to contract for administration of an examination.

(b) The board may deny registration where there are grounds for denial under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(c) The board shall issue a certificate to each qualified individual stating that
 the individual is a registered spectacle lens dispenser.

(d) A registered spectacle lens dispenser is authorized to fit and adjust spectacle lenses at any place of business holding a certificate of registration under Section
 2564.93 or at any location where the practice of ophthalmology or optometry is practiced. The certificate of the registered spectacle lens dispenser shall be displayed in a conspicuous place at the place of business where the registered dispenser is fitting and adjusting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 59.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2559.3.

A certificate issued to a registered spectacle lens dispenser may, in the discretion of the board, be suspended or revoked for violating or attempting to violate any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted under this chapter, or for incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated similar negligent acts performed by the certificate holder. A certificate may also be suspended or revoked if the individual certificate holder has been convicted of a felony as provided in Section 2555.1.

Any proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted
 therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 489, Sec. 23.   (SB 1478)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2559.4.

This article shall not apply to an assistant fitting spectacle lenses pursuant to Section 2544 if the assistant is acting under the direct responsibility and supervision of a physician and surgeon or optometrist who engages in the practice of fitting spectacle lenses for his or her patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 604, Sec. 3.   (AB 2683)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contact Lens Dispensing [2560. - 2564.6.]

2560.

An individual shall not fit and adjust contact lenses, including plano contact lenses unless either of the following applies:

(a) The individual is a duly registered contact lens dispenser as provided in Section 2561.

(b) The individual is an unregistered individual who performs the fitting and adjusting under the direct responsibility and supervision of a duly registered contact lens dispenser who is then physically present on the registered premises. In no event shall a registered contact lens dispenser supervise more than three unregistered individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 8.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2561.

An individual shall apply for registration as a registered contact lens dispenser on forms prescribed by the board. The board shall register an individual as a registered contact lens dispenser upon satisfactory proof that the individual has passed the contact lens registry examination of the National Committee of Contact Lens Examiners or any successor agency to that committee. In the event the board should ever find after hearing that the registry examination is not appropriate to determine entry level competence as a contact lens dispenser or is not designed to measure specific job performance requirements, the board may thereafter from time to time prescribe or administer a written examination that meets those specifications. If an applicant for renewal has not
 engaged in the full-time or substantial part-time practice of fitting and adjusting contact lenses within the last five years then the board may require the applicant to take and pass the examination referred to in this section as a condition of registration. Any examination administered by the board shall be given at least twice each year on dates publicly announced at least 90 days before the examination dates. The board is authorized to contract with the National Committee of Contact Lens Examiners or any successor agency to that committee to provide that the registry examination is given at least twice each year on dates publicly announced at least 90 days before the examination dates.

The board may deny registration where there are grounds for denial under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

The board shall issue a certificate to each qualified individual stating that the individual is a
 registered contact lens dispenser.

A registered contact lens dispenser may use that designation, but shall not hold himself or herself out in advertisements or otherwise as a specialist in fitting and adjusting contact lenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 489, Sec. 25.   (SB 1478)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2562.

Upon satisfactory completion of the fitting of contact lenses, but in no event more than 60 days after receipt of the prescription, a registered contact lens dispenser shall direct the person named in the prescription to return to the prescribing physician and surgeon or optometrist for an evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 418, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to an assistant fitting contact lenses while acting under the direct responsibility and supervision of a physician and surgeon or optometrist who engages in the practice of fitting contact lenses for his or her patients under Section 2544.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (AB 2683)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.5.

A registered contact lens dispenser fitting contact lenses shall maintain accessible handwashing facilities on the premises and those facilities shall be used before each fitting of contact lenses. For purposes of this section, “accessible handwashing facilities” means a clean and sanitary sink with clean running water, disinfectant soap, and adequate drying devices such as a towel or electric hand dryer, which is physically separate from a lavatory or bathroom and is accessible to all relevant persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 9.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.6.

A registered contact lens dispenser shall comply with the applicable provisions of Section 2541.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 10.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Nonresident Ophthalmic Lens Dispensers [2564.70. - 2564.80.]

2564.70.

This act may be cited as the “Nonresident Ophthalmic Lens Dispenser Registration Act.”

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 26.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.71.

(a) A person or entity located outside California shall not ship, mail, furnish, or deliver in any manner, ophthalmic lenses at retail to a patient at a California address unless the person is registered with the California State Board of Optometry.

(b) With regard to any person or entity subject to registration pursuant to this section, only spectacle lenses and replacement contact lenses provided pursuant to a valid prescription as described in Section 2564.76 may be shipped, mailed, furnished, or delivered directly to a patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 11.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.73.

The board may adopt, amend, or repeal any rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to carry out this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546.3 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 29.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.74.

(a) Application for registration as a nonresident ophthalmic lens dispenser shall be made on forms prescribed by the board, accompanied by the fee prescribed by this article, and shall bear the signature of the individual, or individuals if a copartnership, or the president or secretary if a corporation, and shall contain the name or fictitious or assumed name, if applicable, under which the person proposes to do business, location of the business, registration number issued by the board, if applicable, and the designation of an agent for service of process in California.

(b) The board shall be notified in writing within 30 days of any change
 of name or fictitious or assumed name, location of business, corporate officer, or agent of service.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546.4 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 30.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.75.

In order to obtain and maintain registration, a nonresident ophthalmic lens dispenser shall:

(a) Be in good standing and either registered or otherwise authorized in the state or jurisdiction in which the selling facility is located and from which the ophthalmic lenses are sold.

(b) Comply with all directions and requests for information made by the board as authorized under this article.

(c) Maintain records of ophthalmic lenses shipped, mailed, furnished, or delivered to patients in California for a period of at least three years.

(d) Provide a toll-free telephone service for responding to patient questions and complaints during the applicant’s regular hours of operation, but in no event less than six days per week and 40 hours per week. The toll-free number shall be included in literature provided with each mailed ophthalmic lens prescription. All questions relating to eye care for the lens prescribed shall be referred back to the ophthalmic lens prescriber.

(e) Provide the following or a substantially equivalent written notification to the patient whenever contact lenses are supplied:
WARNING: IF YOU ARE HAVING ANY UNEXPLAINED EYE DISCOMFORT, WATERING, VISION CHANGE, OR REDNESS, REMOVE YOUR LENSES IMMEDIATELY AND CONSULT YOUR EYE CARE PRACTITIONER BEFORE WEARING YOUR LENSES AGAIN.
(f) Disclose in any price advertisement any required membership
 fees or enrollment fees and indicate that shipping costs may apply unless the advertisement specifically and clearly states otherwise.

(g) Provide a toll-free telephone number, facsimile line, and email address that are dedicated to prescribers and their authorized agents for the purposes of confirmation of ophthalmic lens prescriptions. These numbers, along with an
 email address, shall be included in any communication with the prescriber when requesting confirmation of an ophthalmic lens prescription.

(h) It shall be considered a deceptive marketing practice for any nonresident ophthalmic lens dispenser to publish or cause to be published any advertisement or sales presentation relating to ophthalmic lenses representing that ophthalmic lenses may be obtained without confirmation of a valid prescription.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 31.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.76.

(a) Contact lenses may be sold only upon receipt of a written prescription or a copy of a written prescription and may be sold in quantities consistent with the prescription’s established expiration date and the standard packaging of the manufacturer or vendor. If the written prescription or a copy of it is not available to the dispenser, the dispenser shall confirm the prescription by direct communication with the prescriber or the prescriber’s authorized agent before furnishing, shipping, mailing, or delivering any lens, and maintain a record of the communication. A prescription shall be deemed confirmed upon the occurrence of one of the following:

(1) The prescriber or the
 prescriber’s agent confirms the prescription by communication with the dispenser.

(2) The prescriber fails to communicate with the dispenser within eight business hours after the dispenser requests confirmation, or the prescriber fails to communicate with the dispenser by the next business day on or before the same time of day that the dispenser requested confirmation, whichever is sooner. For purposes of this paragraph, “business day” means each day except a Sunday or a federal holiday.

(b) If a prescriber communicates with a dispenser before the time period described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) elapses and informs the dispenser that the contact lens prescription is invalid, the dispenser shall not fill the prescription. The prescriber shall specify in the communication
 with the dispenser the basis for invalidating the prescription.

(c) A dispenser shall not alter any of the specifications of a contact lens prescription, other than the color, or substitute a different manufacturer, brand, or other physical property of the lens.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the contact lens is manufactured by a company, but sold under multiple private labels by that same company to individual providers, the dispenser may fill the prescription with a contact lens manufactured by that company if the contact lens prescription and the related parameters are not substituted, changed, or altered for a different manufacturer or brand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 12.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.77.

(a) A certificate may be denied, to the extent authorized by Section 480, or suspended, revoked, or otherwise subjected to discipline for any of the following:

(1) Incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated similar negligent acts performed by the registrant or any employee of the registrant.

(2) An act of dishonesty or fraud.

(3) Committing any act or being convicted of a crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure or registration under Section 480.

(4) Any violation of Section 2564.75 or 2564.76.

(b) The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all powers granted therein.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546.7 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 33.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.78.

Every registration issued to a nonresident ophthalmic lens dispenser shall expire 24 months after the initial date of issuance. To renew an unexpired registration, the registrant shall, before the time at which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the
 board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546.8 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 34.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.79.

The amount of fees prescribed in connection with the registration of nonresident ophthalmic lens dispensers is that established by the following schedule:

(a) The application and registration fee for a nonresident ophthalmic lens dispenser shall be a minimum of five hundred dollars ($500) and shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(b) The biennial renewal fee shall be a minimum of three hundred dollars ($300) and shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The delinquency fee shall be a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) The fee for replacement of a lost, stolen, or destroyed registration shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) The California State Board of Optometry may periodically revise and fix by regulation the fees
 specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), and these revised fees shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory cost.

(f) The fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Optometry Fund, and shall be available, upon appropriation, to the California State Board of Optometry for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 13.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.80.

(a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per violation. The fines collected pursuant to this section shall be available upon appropriation to the California State Board of Optometry for the purposes of administration and enforcement.

(b) The California State Board of Optometry shall adopt regulations implementing this section and shall consider the following factors, including, but not limited to, applicable enforcement penalties, prior conduct, gravity of the offense, and the
 manner in which complaints will be processed.

(c) The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546.10 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 36.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Registered Dispensing Ophthalmic Businesses [2564.90. - 2564.94.]

2564.90.

For purposes of this chapter, “Dispensing Ophthalmic Business” means a person or entity that meets either of the following criteria:

(a) Is engaged in the business of dispensing prescription ophthalmic devices, as defined in Section 2541.

(b) Satisfies both of the following requirements:

(1) Has executed a lease, sublease,
 contract, or other written agreement with a licensed physician and surgeon or optometrist, or a corporation or other business entity for which a licensed physician and surgeon or optometrist is a shareholder, director, or officer.

(2) Offers, advertises, or performs optical services for the general public on behalf of a licensed physician and surgeon or optometrist, or a corporation or other business entity for which a licensed physician and surgeon or optometrist is a shareholder, director, or officer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 15.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.91.

(a) Individuals, corporations, and firms shall make application for registration and shall not engage in that business defined in Section 2564.90 before being issued a certificate
 of registration.

(b) Application for that registration shall be on forms prescribed by the board, shall bear the signature of the individual, or general partners if a partnership, or the president or secretary if a corporation or firm, and shall contain the name under which they propose to do business and the business address.

(c) Corporations and firms shall be organized and exist pursuant to the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) and shall not be
 limited liability companies within the meaning of Title 2.6 of the Corporations Code.

(d) If applicable, the application shall include a list of officers in the corporation, firm, or partnership and a copy of the articles of incorporation submitted to the Secretary of State.

(e) Separate applications shall be made for each place of business and each application shall be accompanied by the application fee prescribed by Section
 2565.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2551 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 41.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.92.

(a) Each application shall be verified under oath by the person required to sign the application and shall designate the name, address, and direct business telephone number of the applicant’s employee who will be responsible for handling customer inquiries and complaints with respect to the business address for which registration is applied. Any changes to this information shall be reported in writing to the board within 14 days.

(b) The applicant shall furnish such additional information or proof, oral or written, which the board may request, including information and proof relating to the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(c) The board shall promptly notify an applicant if, as of the 30th day following the submission of an application under this chapter, the application and supporting documentation are not substantially complete and in proper form. The notification shall be in writing, shall state specifically what documents or other information are to be supplied by the applicant to the board, and shall be sent to the applicant by certified, electronic, or registered mail. Within 30 days of the applicant’s submission of the requested documents or information to the board, the board shall notify the applicant by certified, electronic, or registered mail if the board requires additional documents or information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 67.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.93.

(a) If the board, after investigation, approves the application, it shall register the applicant and issue to the applicant a certificate of dispensing ophthalmic business. A separate certificate of registration shall be required for each address where the business is to be conducted.

(b) A certificate authorizes the applicant, its agents, and employees, acting therefor, to engage in the business defined in Section 2564.90 provided that the fitting and adjusting of spectacle lenses is
 performed in compliance with Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2559.1) and the fitting and adjusting of contact lenses is performed in compliance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 2560). Only individuals registered with the board pursuant to those sections shall perform those supervisory functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 68.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.94.

(a) If a registered dispensing ophthalmic business sells or transfers ownership of their place of business, both of the following requirements shall be satisfied:

(1) The registered dispensing ophthalmic business selling or transferring ownership of the business shall return the certificate of registration to the board no later than 10 calendar days after the change of ownership is completed. This registered dispensing ophthalmic business shall be responsible for complying with all laws relating to the dispensing ophthalmic business until the notice described in paragraph (2) is received by the board.

(2) The
 registered dispensing ophthalmic business assuming ownership of the business shall record with the board a written notice of the change of ownership, providing all information required by the board. This notice shall be filed with the board no later than 10 calendar days after the change of ownership is completed.

(3) The registered dispensing ophthalmic business assuming ownership of the business shall apply for a new certificate of registration from the board no later than 10 calendar days after the change of ownership is completed.

(b) This section does not apply to a change of location of business by a registered dispensing optician.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2553.1 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 45.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [2565. - 2568.]

2565.

The amount of fees prescribed in connection with the registration of dispensing ophthalmic businesses shall be as set forth in this section.

(a) The application and registration fee shall be a minimum of five hundred dollars ($500) and shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(b) The biennial renewal fee shall be a minimum of three hundred dollars ($300) and shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The delinquency fee shall be a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) The fee for replacement of a lost, stolen, or destroyed certificate shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) The California State Board of Optometry may periodically revise and fix by regulation the fees
 specified in subdivisions (a), (b),
 and (c), and these revised fees shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 16.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2566.

The amount of fees prescribed in connection with certificates for contact lens dispensers is as follows:

(a) The application and registration fee for a registered contact lens dispenser shall be a minimum of five hundred dollars ($500) and shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(b) The biennial fee for the renewal of certificates shall be a minimum of three hundred dollars ($300) and shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The delinquency fee
 shall be a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) The California State Board of Optometry may by regulation provide for a refund of a portion of the application fee to applicants who do not meet the requirements for registration.

(e) The California State Board of Optometry may periodically
 revise and fix by regulation the fees specified in subdivisions (a), (b),
 and (c), and these revised fees shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory cost.

(f) The fee for replacement of a lost, stolen, or destroyed certificate is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 17.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2566.1.

The amount of fees prescribed in connection with certificates for spectacle lens dispensers shall be as set forth in this section:

(a) The application and registration fee shall be a minimum of five hundred dollars ($500) and shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(b) The biennial renewal fee shall be a minimum of three hundred dollars ($300) and shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The delinquency fee shall be a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) The fee for replacement of a lost, stolen, or destroyed certificate is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) The California State Board of Optometry may periodically revise and fix by regulation the fees
 specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), and these revised fees shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 18.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2566.2.

Every registration issued to a dispensing ophthalmic business, contact lens dispenser, and spectacle lens dispenser shall expire 24 months after the initial date of issuance or renewal. To renew an unexpired registration, the registrant shall, before the time at which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 72.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2567.

(a) All fees collected from persons registered or seeking registration under this chapter shall be paid into the Optometry Fund, and shall be available, upon appropriation, to the California State Board of Optometry for the purposes of this chapter. Any moneys within the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Optometry Fund. Any moneys within the Dispensing Opticians Fund collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Optometry Fund.

(b) The board may employ, subject to civil service regulations, whatever additional clerical assistance is necessary for the administration of this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 73.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2568.

The board shall report to the Controller at the beginning of each month for the month preceding the amount and source of all revenue received by it pursuant to this chapter, and shall pay the entire amount thereof to the Treasurer for deposit in the Optometry Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 121, Sec. 8.   (AB 896)   Effective September 24, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.6. Occupational Therapy [2570. - 2572.]

2570.

This chapter may be cited as the Occupational Therapy Practice Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.1.

The Legislature finds and declares that the practice of occupational therapy in California affects the public health, safety, and welfare and there is a necessity for that practice to be subject to regulation and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.2.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Appropriate supervision of an aide” means that the responsible occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant shall provide direct in-sight supervision when the aide is providing delegated client-related tasks and shall be readily available at all times to provide advice or instruction to the aide. The occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant is responsible for documenting the client’s record concerning the delegated client-related tasks performed by the aide.

(b) “Aide” means an individual who provides supportive services to an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant and who is trained by an occupational
 therapist or occupational therapy assistant to perform, under appropriate supervision, delegated, selected client and nonclient-related tasks for which the aide has demonstrated competency. An occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter may utilize the services of one aide engaged in client-related tasks to assist the occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in the practice of occupational therapy. The occupational therapist shall be responsible for the overall use and actions of the aide.

(c) “Association” means the Occupational Therapy Association of California or a similarly constituted organization representing occupational therapists in this state.

(d) “Board” means the California Board of Occupational Therapy.

(e) “Continuing competence” means a
 dynamic and multidimensional process in which the occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant develops and maintains the knowledge, performance skills, interpersonal abilities, critical reasoning, and ethical reasoning skills necessary to perform current and future roles and responsibilities within the profession. 
